Utah statutes.
78A-2-217.   Electronic writing.

(1)  Except as restricted by the Constitution of the United States or of this state, any writing required or permitted by this code to be filed with or prepared by a court may be filed or prepared in an electronic medium and by electronic transmission subject to the ability of the recipient to accept and process the electronic writing.

(2)  Any writing required to be signed that is filed with or prepared by a court in an electronic medium or by electronic transmission shall be signed by electronic signature in accordance with Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

